Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Agreement Practices of Product Manufacturers.

Sec. 45.27.010.
Consent to transfer of agreement.

A manufacturer may not unreasonably withhold consent to the sale or other transfer of a dealership agreement by an authorized dealer to a transferee if the transferee

meets the criteria generally applied by the manufacturer when approving new authorized dealers; and

agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the standard form of the dealership agreement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.020.
Cancellation or nonrenewal of agreement.

A manufacturer may not cancel or decline to renew a dealership agreement with an authorized dealer unless

the manufacturer has

satisfied the notice requirements of this chapter; and

shown that there is good cause for the cancellation or nonrenewal of the dealership agreement, and, if the reasons underlying the good cause can be corrected by the authorized dealer, the authorized dealer has failed for 60 days after delivery of the notice required by AS

45.27.030

to make the corrections; the circumstances identified under AS

45.27.030(a)(2)

, for which a 15-day notice of cancellation or nonrenewal is required, do not qualify as reasons for which correction is allowed under this paragraph; or

the authorized dealer has engaged in fraud

against consumers or the manufacturer; or

in the operation of the authorized dealer’s dealership.

Under (a)(1)(B) of this section, an authorized dealer may not prevent a cancellation or nonrenewal of a dealership agreement more than two times by making corrections.

Notwithstanding (a)(1) of this section, a manufacturer may not cancel or decline to renew a dealership agreement with an authorized dealer because of the death or incapacity of an owner if the owner is not listed in the agreement as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer relied in the granting of the agreement.

In this section, “good cause” includes circumstances in which the authorized dealer fails to comply with or observe a material provision of the dealership agreement with the authorized dealer. For the purpose of determining good cause under this subsection, reasonable sales and service performance criteria and capital and facility requirements may be considered material provisions only if the criteria or requirements were communicated in writing to the authorized dealer within a reasonable period of not less than six months before the effective date of the cancellation or nonrenewal, to afford the authorized dealer a reasonable opportunity to comply with the criteria or requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.030.
Notice of cancellation or nonrenewal.

A manufacturer shall furnish a notice of cancellation or nonrenewal of a dealership agreement with an authorized dealer to an authorized dealer at least

90 days before the effective date of a cancellation or nonrenewal, except as provided under (2) of this subsection;

15 days before the effective date of a cancellation or nonrenewal when the authorized dealer

is insolvent or is the subject of a bankruptcy or receivership proceeding;

is convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude or fraud under the law of this state, another state, the federal government, a territory of the United States, or the District of Columbia;

has violated a term of the dealership agreement with the manufacturer, the violation of which the manufacturer and the authorized dealer have agreed in the dealership agreement constitutes a basis for cancellation or nonrenewal.

Notice required under (a) of this section must be in writing, shall be sent by certified mail or personally delivered to the authorized dealer, and must contain

a statement of intention to cancel or not renew the dealership agreement;

a statement of the reasons for the cancellation or nonrenewal; and

the date on which the cancellation or nonrenewal takes effect.

In this section, “mail” means registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.040.
Threat of cancellation or nonrenewal.

A manufacturer or manufacturer’s representative may not coerce or attempt to coerce an authorized dealer to enter into a dealership agreement with the manufacturer or a subsidiary of the manufacturer, or to perform any other act unfair to the authorized dealer, by threatening to terminate a dealership agreement between the manufacturer or subsidiary of the manufacturer and the authorized dealer.

This section does not prohibit a voluntary agreement between a manufacturer and an authorized dealer to settle legitimate disputes.

In this section, “manufacturer’s representative” means an employee or agent of a manufacturer who engages in the business of contacting a manufacturer’s authorized dealer for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of the manufacturer’s products or product parts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.050.
Repurchase obligations on cancellation or nonrenewal.

On the cancellation or nonrenewal of a dealership agreement by a manufacturer without satisfying the requirements under AS

45.27.020

, the manufacturer shall repurchase from the authorized dealer’s inventory

each new and unused product of the manufacturer that is a current product model, or the product model from the previous year; and

each product part that

was purchased from the manufacturer by the authorized dealer;

is listed in the manufacturer’s parts price books in the previous two years; and

has not been damaged or substantially altered to the prejudice of the manufacturer while in the possession of the authorized dealer.

Within 90 days after the effective date of the cancellation or nonrenewal, the authorized dealer shall return the property required by (a) of this section to be repurchased to the manufacturer at the manufacturer’s expense. The manufacturer shall pay the compensation for the property within 60 days after the tender of inventory and other items if the authorized dealer has clear title to the property and is in a position to convey that title to the manufacturer. If the property is subject to a security interest, the manufacturer may make the payments jointly to the authorized dealer and the holder of the security interest, and the manufacturer may offset the payment.

The amount of a repurchase required by (a) of this section must be based on the authorized dealer’s landed cost, subject to adjustments to landed costs for quarterly or annual purchase rebates and credits given to the authorized dealer on the products or product parts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)